Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2981
Distributions.

(1) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws and subject to subsection (2) of this section, the board of directors may authorize, and the limited cooperative association may make, distributions to members.

(2) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, distributions to members may be made in the form of cash, capital credits, allocated patronage equities, revolving fund certificates, the limited cooperative association's own securities or other securities, or in any other manner.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 81.